Utah statutes.
17-53-317.   Executive appointment with advice and consent of county legislative body.

(1)  The appointment of a person to fill a position on a board, committee, or similar body whose membership is appointed by the county shall be by the county executive, with the advice and consent of the county legislative body.

(2) (a)  As used in this Subsection (2), "interim vacancy period" means:

(i)  for a county commission form or expanded county commission form of government, the period of time that:

(A)  begins on the day on which a general election described in Section 17-16-6 is held to elect a commission member; and

(B)  ends on the day on which the commission member-elect begins the council member's term; or

(ii)  for a county executive-council form of government, the period of time that:

(A)  begins on the day on which a general election described in Section 17-16-6 is held to elect a county executive; and

(B)  ends on the day on which the county executive-elect begins the county executive's term.

(b) (i)  A county commission in a county commission form of government, or a county commission in an expanded county commission form of government, may not appoint during an interim period vacancy a manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position to perform executive and administrative duties or functions.

(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b)(i):

(A)  a county commission in a county commission form of government, or a county commission in an expanded county commission form of government, may appoint an interim manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position during an interim vacancy period; and

(B)  the interim appointee's term shall expire once a new manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position is appointed by the new administration after the interim vacancy period has ended.

(c)  Subsection (2)(b) does not apply if all the county commission members who held office on the day of the county general election whose term of office was vacant for the election are re-elected to the county commission for the following term.

(d) (i)  A county executive in a county executive-council form of government may not appoint during an interim vacancy period a manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position to perform executive and administrative duties or functions.

(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(d)(i):

(A)  a county executive in a county executive-council form of government may appoint an interim manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position during an interim vacancy period; and

(B)  the interim appointee's term shall expire once a new manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position is appointed by the new county executive after the interim vacancy period has ended.

(e)  Subsection (2)(d) does not apply if the county executive who held office on the day of the county general election is re-elected to the office of county executive for the following term.

(3)  A county commission in a county commission form of government, a county commission in an expanded county commission form of government, or a county executive in a county executive-council form of government that appoints a manager, a chief executive officer, a chief administrative officer, or a similar position in accordance with this section may not, on or after May 10, 2011, enter into an employment contract that contains an automatic renewal provision with the manager, chief executive officer, chief administrative officer, or similar position.



Amended by Chapter 209, 2011 General Session

